Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-323
Evidence of insurance, defined.

Evidence of insurance means evidence of a current and effective automobile
liability policy in paper or
electronic format.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 23;

Laws 2014, LB816, § 2.